Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska89-187.04
Permit; placed-in-service report or inspection; when not required.

An applicant for a permit with commercial weighing and measuring devices registered with the department shall not be required to obtain a placed-in-service report or have such devices pass a new inspection when (1) the director determines that a new inspection is not necessary and (2) the devices have been properly registered for the previous year and all fees have been paid by the applicant.

Laws 1991, LB 356, § 15.